Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska73-306
Rules and regulations.

The Department of Administrative Services shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out sections 73-301 to 73-305. Such rules and regulations shall apply to the Director of Administrative Services in carrying out his or her duties pursuant to such sections.

Laws 1995, LB 519, § 10.